District of Columbia statutes.
1-143

Staff to be used.

Wherever practicable, the District of Columbia flag shall be flown on the same staff as the United States flag.

July 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-121, § 4, 29 DCR 2072
1981 Ed., § 1-123.